Washington statutes.
RCW 19.02.080

Licensing fees—Disposition of.

All fees collected under the system must be deposited with the state treasurer. Upon issuance or renewal of the business license or supplemental licenses, the department must distribute the fees, except for fees covered under RCW 19.02.210 and for fees covered under RCW 19.80.075, to the appropriate accounts under the applicable statutes for those agencies' licenses.

[ 2013 c 144 s 21; 1992 c 107 s 3; 1982 c 182 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1992 c 107: See note following RCW 19.02.020.